Illinois, session 104th, HB3576.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 4-101 and by adding Section 4-102 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/4-101)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 4-101)7    Sec. 4-101. The Commerce Commission shall have general 8supervision of all public utilities, except as otherwise 9provided in this Act, shall inquire into the management of the 10business thereof and shall keep itself informed as to the 11manner and method in which the business is conducted. It shall 12examine those public utilities and keep informed as to their 13general condition, their franchises, capitalization, rates and 14other charges, and the manner in which their plants, equipment 15and other property owned, leased, controlled or operated are 16managed, conducted and operated, not only with respect to the 17adequacy, security and accommodation afforded by their service 18but also with respect to their compliance with this Act and any 19other law, with the orders of the Commission and with the 20charter and franchise requirements.21    Whenever the Commission is authorized or required by law 22to consider some aspect of criminal history record information 23for the purpose of carrying out its statutory powers and   HB3576- 2 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1responsibilities, then, upon request and payment of fees in 2conformance with the requirements of Section 2605-400 of the 3Illinois State Police Law, the Illinois State Police is 4authorized to furnish, pursuant to positive identification, 5such information contained in State files as is necessary to 6fulfill the request.7    The Commission shall require all public utilities to 8establish a security policy that includes on-site safeguards 9to restrict physical or electronic access to critical 10infrastructure and computerized control and data systems. The 11Commission shall maintain a record of and each regulated 12entity shall provide to the Commission an annual affidavit 13signed by a representative of the regulated entity that 14states: 15        (1) that the entity has a security policy in place;16        (2) that the entity has conducted at least one 17    practice exercise based on the security policy within the 18    12 months immediately preceding the date of the affidavit; 19    and20        (3) with respect to any entity that is an electric 21    public utility, that the entity follows, at a minimum, the 22    most current security standards set forth by the North 23    American Electric Reliability Council.24    A water public utility's security policy shall also meet 25the requirements set forth in Section 4-102. 26(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB3576- 3 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1    (220 ILCS 5/4-102 new)2    Sec. 4-102. Cybersecurity policy for water purveyors.3    (a) As used in this Section:4    "Cybersecurity incident" means an event occurring on or 5conducted through a computer network that jeopardizes the 6integrity, confidentiality, or availability of computers, 7information systems, communications systems, networks, 8physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or 9information systems, or information residing on such computers 10or information systems.11    "Cybersecurity insurance policy" means an insurance policy 12designed to mitigate losses from cybersecurity incidents, 13including, but not limited to, data breaches, business 14interruption, and network damage.15    "Department" means the Department of Natural Resources.16    "Industrial control system" means an information system 17used to control industrial processes such as manufacturing, 18product handling, production, or distribution.19    "Industrial control system" includes supervisory control 20and data acquisition systems used to control geographically 21dispersed assets, and distributed control systems and smaller 22control systems using programmable logic controllers to 23control localized processes.24    "Information resource" means information and related 25resources, such as personnel, equipment, funds, and   HB3576- 4 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1information technology.2    "Information system" means a discrete set of information 3resources organized for the collection, processing, 4maintenance, use, sharing, dissemination, or disposition of 5information.6    "Public community water system" means a public water 7system which serves at least 15 service connections used by 8year-round residents or regularly serves at least 25 9year-round residents.10    "Public water system" means a system for the provision to 11the public of water for human consumption through pipes or 12other constructed conveyances, if such system has at least 15 13service connections or regularly serves an average of at least 1425 individuals daily at least 60 days out of the year. "Public 15water system" includes (i) any collection, treatment, storage 16and distribution facilities under control of the operator of 17such system and used primarily in connection with such system, 18and (ii) any collection or pre-treatment storage facilities 19not under such control which are used primarily in connection 20with such system.21    "Water purveyor" means any person that owns a public 22community water system with more than 500 service connections.23    (b) Within 120 days after the effective date of this 24amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each water 25purveyor shall develop a cybersecurity program that defines 26and implements organizational accountabilities and   HB3576- 5 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1responsibilities for cyber risk management activities, and 2establishes policies, plans, processes, and procedures for 3identifying and mitigating cyber risk to the water purveyor's 4public community water system. As part of the cybersecurity 5program, a water purveyor shall do the following:6        (1) identify the individual directly responsible for 7    ensuring that the policies, plans, processes, and 8    procedures established pursuant to this Section are 9    executed in a timely manner;10        (2) conduct risk assessments and implement appropriate 11    controls to mitigate identified risks to the public 12    community water system;13        (3) maintain situational awareness of cyber threats 14    and vulnerabilities to the public community water system; 15    and16        (4) create and exercise incident response and recovery 17    plans.18    A water purveyor shall submit a copy of the cybersecurity 19program developed pursuant to this subsection (b) to the 20Commission in a form and manner as determined by the 21Commission.22    (c) Within 60 days after developing the cybersecurity 23program required pursuant to subsection (b) of this Section, 24each water purveyor shall create a cybersecurity incident 25reporting process.26    (d) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this   HB3576- 6 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each water 2purveyor shall obtain a cybersecurity insurance policy that 3meets any applicable standards adopted by the Commission.4    (e) No later than 180 days after the effective date of this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, each water 6purveyor shall update its cybersecurity program developed 7pursuant to this Section to apply to all of the public 8community water system's industrial control systems and to 9reasonably conform to the most recent version of one or more of 10the following industry-recognized cybersecurity frameworks:11        (1) the Framework for Improving Critical 12    Infrastructure Cybersecurity developed by the National 13    Institute of Standards and Technology;14        (2) the Center for Internet Security Critical Security 15    Controls for Effective Cyber Defense; or16        (3) the International Organization for Standardization 17    and International Electrotechnical Commission 27000 family 18    of standards for an information security management 19    system.20    Whenever a final revision to one or more of the frameworks 21listed in this subsection (e) is published, a water purveyor 22whose cybersecurity program conformed to that framework shall 23revise its cybersecurity program to reasonably conform to the 24revised framework, and submit a copy of the revised 25cybersecurity program to the Commission, no later than 180 26days after publication of the revised framework.  HB3576- 7 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1    (f) No later than one year after the effective date of this 2amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, and each year 3thereafter, each water purveyor shall submit to the Department 4and the Commission a certification demonstrating that the 5water purveyor is in compliance with the requirements of this 6Section. The certification shall be made in a form and manner 7as determined by the Department, in consultation with the 8Commission. The certification shall be signed by a senior 9executive responsible for security of the regulated entity.10    (g) The Commission shall cause to be audited any public 11community water system that fails to submit a cybersecurity 12program, a revision, or a certification pursuant to this 13Section. Any audit shall be conducted by a qualified and 14independent cybersecurity company, at the water purveyor's 15expense. Following the audit, the water purveyor shall submit 16the audit and any corrective action plans derived from the 17audit to the Commission.18    (h) A water purveyor shall, upon the request of the 19Department or the Commission, provide proof of compliance with 20the requirements of this Section, in a form and manner as 21determined by the Department or by the Commission.22    (i) On and after 90 days after the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, a water purveyor 24shall inform the Commission, in a written or oral report, 25within 48 hours or as soon as practicable after the discovery 26or occurrence of any notable, unusual, or significant   HB3576- 8 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1cybersecurity incident or any cybersecurity incident that must 2be reported to another regulatory agency, including the 3following:4        (1) any cybersecurity incident that results in the 5    compromise of the confidentiality, integrity, 6    availability, or privacy of the water purveyor's utility 7    billing, communications, data management, or business 8    information systems, or the information on such systems; 9    and10        (2) any cybersecurity incident against the water 11    purveyor's industrial control systems, including 12    monitoring, operations, and centralized control systems, 13    that adversely impacts, disables, or manipulates 14    infrastructure, resulting in loss of service, 15    contamination of finished water, or damage to 16    infrastructure.17    (j) No later than 30 days after receiving a report of a 18cybersecurity incident from a water purveyor pursuant to 19subsection (i), the Commission shall cause to be audited the 20water purveyor's cybersecurity program and any actions the 21water purveyor took in response to the cybersecurity incident. 22The audit shall identify cyber threats and vulnerabilities to 23the public community water system, weaknesses in the public 24community water system's cybersecurity program, and strategies 25to address those weaknesses so as to protect the public 26community water system from the threat of future cybersecurity   HB3576- 9 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1incidents. Any audit shall be conducted by a qualified and 2independent cybersecurity company at the water purveyor's 3expense. After the completion of the audit, the water purveyor 4shall submit the audit and any corrective action plans derived 5from the audit to the Commission.6    (k) By July 31 of each year, a water purveyor shall provide 7to the Commission a report that identifies the following:8        (1) an overview of the water purveyor's approach to 9    cybersecurity awareness and protection;10        (2) a description of cybersecurity awareness training 11    efforts for the water purveyor's staff members, 12    specialized cybersecurity training for cybersecurity 13    personnel, and participation by the water purveyor's 14    cybersecurity staff in emergency preparedness exercises in 15    the previous calendar year;16        (3) an organizational diagram of the water purveyor's 17    cybersecurity organization, including positions and 18    contact information for primary and secondary 19    cybersecurity emergency contacts;20        (4) a description of the water purveyor's internal and 21    external communications plan regarding unauthorized 22    actions that result in interruption, degradation of 23    service, financial harm, or breach of sensitive business 24    or customer data, including the water purveyor's plan for 25    notifying the Commission and customers;26        (5) a redacted summary of any unauthorized actions   HB3576- 10 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1    that resulted in material interruption, financial harm, or 2    breach of sensitive business or customer data, including 3    the parties that were notified of the unauthorized action 4    and any remedial actions undertaken;5        (6) key performance indicators and other metrics 6    related to physical security and cybersecurity;7        (7) any notable cybersecurity information not included 8    in paragraphs (1) through (6); and9        (8) any other information as directed by the 10    Commission.11    (l) The Department or the Commission shall create a 12centralized portal allowing for electronic submittal of the 13report required under this Section. The lack of a centralized 14portal pursuant to this subsection (l) shall not negate the 15requirement for a water purveyor to submit a report.16    (m) Any person who violates the provisions of this 17Section, or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto, 18shall be subject to the penalties and other remedies set forth 19in Sections 4-202 and Section 4-203. No later than 18 months 20after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th 21General Assembly, the Department shall adopt a schedule of 22civil administrative penalties for specific violations of this 23Section.24    (n) Reports and other submissions made under this Section 25shall not be open to public inspection unless otherwise 26ordered by the Commission. Regulated entities shall not report   HB3576- 11 -LRB104 08875 AAS 18930 b1information otherwise required under this Section if 2prohibited by law or court order or instructed otherwise by 3law enforcement personnel.4    (o) The Department or the Commission may adopt rules to 5implement this Section.